spanish.lexc
!!! spanish.lexc !!!
Multichar_Symbols +V +1P +2P +3P +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root

Verb ;

LEXICON Verb

pedir Vinf;
medir Vinf;
renir Vinf;

LEXICON Vinf

+V:0             #;
+V+1P+Sg:^o      #;
+V+2P+Sg:^es     #;
+V+3P+Sg:^e      #;
+V+1P+Pl:^imos   #;
+V+2P+Pl:^Is     #;
+V+3P+Pl:^en     #;
